Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Section 2 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 414.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding ORS 414.065 and 414.690, medical  assistance provided to a
member of a coordinated care organization or a medical assistance recipient  who is not en-
rolled in a coordinated care organization shall  include the testing and treatment, as de-
scribed in section 4 of this 2024 Act, performed or provided by a pharmacist.
SECTION 3. Section 4 of this 2024 Act is added to and made a part of ORS chapter 689.
SECTION 4. (1) Consistent with the protocols adopted by the State Board of Pharmacy
by rule, as recommended by the Public Health and  Pharmacy Formulary Advisory Commit-
tee, a pharmacist may  test for severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2
(SARS-CoV-2) and prescribe, dispense and administer treatment, including drug therapy,  for
SARS-CoV-2.
(2) When testing for SARS-CoV-2, a pharmacist may use:
(a) A screening procedure that can be safely performed by a pharmacist; and
(b) A test that:
(A) Guides the pharmacist’s clinical decision-making;
(B) Is determined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services to qualify as  a
waived test under the Clinical Laboratory Improvement  Amendments of 1988 (P.L. 100-578,
42 U.S.C. 201  and 263a) or federal regulations adopted pursuant to the Clinical Laboratory
Improvement Amendments  of 1988 or is approved by the United States Food and Drug Ad-
ministration; and
(C) Is approved by the board by rule for use under this section.
(3) A pharmacist may delegate  to a pharmacy technician or an intern under the
pharmacist’s supervision the  administrative and technical tasks of performing a task de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
(4) The board may adopt rules as necessary to carry out this section.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 689.005 is amended to read:
689.005. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Administer” means the  direct application of a drug or device whether by injection,
inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1506 (SB 1506-A) Page 1
(a) A practitioner or the practitioner’s authorized agent; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.
(2) “Approved continuing pharmacy education program” means those seminars, classes,
meetings, workshops  and other educational programs on the subject of pharmacy approved by the
State Board of Pharmacy.
(3) “Clinical pharmacy agreement” means an agreement  between a pharmacist or pharmacy and
a health  care organization or a physician as defined in ORS 677.010 or a naturopathic physician as
defined in  ORS 685.010 that permits the pharmacist to engage in the practice of clinical pharmacy
for the benefit of the patients of the health care organization, physician or naturopathic physician.
(4) “Continuing pharmacy education” means:
(a) Professional, pharmaceutical post-graduate  education in the general areas of socio-economic
and legal aspects of health care;
(b) The properties and actions of drugs and dosage forms; and
(c) The etiology, characteristics and therapeutics of the disease state.
(5) “Continuing pharmacy education unit”  means the unit of measurement of credits for ap-
proved continuing education courses and programs.
(6) “Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive or attempted  transfer of a drug or
device other than by administration from one person to another, whether or not for a consideration.
(7) “Device” means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro
reagent or other similar or related article, including any component part or accessory, which is re-
quired under federal or state law to be prescribed by a practitioner and  dispensed by a pharmacist.
(8) “Dispense” or “dispensing”  means the preparation and delivery of a prescription drug pur-
suant to a lawful order of a practitioner in a  suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent
administration to or use by a patient or other individual entitled to receive the prescription drug.
(9) “Distribute” means the delivery of a drug other than by administering or dispensing.
(10) “Drug” means:
(a) Articles recognized as drugs  in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official National
Formulary, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia,  other drug compendium or any supplement to any
of them;
(b) Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,  treatment or prevention of dis-
ease in a human or other animal;
(c) Articles, other than food, intended to affect the  structure or any function of the body of
humans or other animals; and
(d) Articles intended for use as a  component of any articles specified in paragraph (a), (b) or (c)
of this subsection.
(11) “Drug order” means a written order, in a hospital or other inpatient care facility,  for an
ultimate user of any drug or device issued and signed by a practitioner, or an order  transmitted by
other means of communication from a practitioner, that  is immediately reduced to writing by a
pharmacist, licensed nurse or other practitioner.
(12) “Drug outlet” means a pharmacy, nursing home, shelter home, convalescent home, extended
care facility, drug abuse  treatment center, penal institution, hospital, family planning clinic, student
health center, retail store, wholesaler, manufacturer, mail-order vendor or other establishment with
facilities located within or out of this state that is engaged in dispensing,  delivery or distribution
of drugs within this state.
(13) “Drug room” means a secure and lockable  location within an inpatient care facility that
does not have a licensed pharmacy.
(14) “Electronically transmitted” or “electronic transmission”  means a communication sent or
received through technological apparatuses, including computer  terminals or other equipment or
mechanisms linked by telephone or microwave relays, or similar apparatus having electrical,  digital,
magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1506 (SB 1506-A) Page 2
(15) “Injectable hormonal contraceptive” means a drug composed of  a hormone or a combination
of hormones that is approved by the United States Food and Drug  Administration to prevent preg-
nancy and that a health care practitioner administers to the patient by injection.
(16) “Institutional  drug outlet” means hospitals and inpatient care facilities where medications
are dispensed to another health care professional for administration to patients served by the hos-
pitals or facilities.
(17) “Intern” means a person who is enrolled in or has completed a course of study at  a school
or college of pharmacy approved by the board and who is licensed with the board as an intern.
(18) “Internship” means a professional experiential program approved by  the board under the
supervision of a licensed pharmacist registered with the board as a preceptor.
(19) “Labeling” means  the process of preparing and affixing of a label to any drug container
exclusive,  however,  of the labeling by a manufacturer, packer or distributor of a nonprescription
drug or commercially packaged legend drug or device.
(20) “Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion
or processing of a device or a drug, either directly or indirectly by  extraction from substances of
natural origin or independently  by means of chemical synthesis or by a combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substances or labeling or
relabeling of its container,  except that this term does not include the preparation or compounding
of a  drug by an individual for their own use or the preparation, compounding, packaging or labeling
of a drug:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident to administering or dispensing of a drug in the course of
professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner  or by the practitioner’s authorization under supervision of the practitioner
for the purpose of or as an incident to research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(21) “Manufacturer” means a person engaged in the manufacture of drugs.
(22) “Nonprescription drug outlet” means a business  or other establishment that is open to the
general public for the sale or nonprofit distribution of nonprescription drugs and is  registered under
ORS 689.305.
(23) “Nonprescription drugs” means drugs that may be sold without a prescription and  that are
prepackaged for use by  the consumer and labeled in accordance with the requirements of the stat-
utes and regulations of this state and the federal government.
(24) “Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, association or other legal entity.
(25) “Pharmacist” means an individual licensed by this state to  engage in the practice of phar-
macy or to engage in the practice of clinical pharmacy.
(26) “Pharmacy” means a place that meets the requirements of rules of the board,  is licensed
and approved by the board where the  practice of pharmacy may lawfully occur and includes
apothecaries,  drug  stores, dispensaries, hospital outpatient pharmacies, pharmacy departments and
prescription laboratories but does not include a place used by a manufacturer or wholesaler.
(27) “Pharmacy technician”  means a person licensed by the board who assists in the practice
of pharmacy pursuant to rules of the board.
(28) “Practice of clinical pharmacy” means:
(a) The health science discipline in which, in conjunction with the  patient’s other practitioners,
a pharmacist provides patient care to optimize medication therapy and  to promote disease pre-
vention and the patient’s health and wellness;
(b) The provision of patient  care services, including but not limited to post-diagnostic disease
state management services; and
(c) The practice of pharmacy by a pharmacist pursuant to a clinical pharmacy agreement.
(29) “Practice of pharmacy” means:
(a) The interpretation and evaluation of prescription orders;
(b) The compounding, dispensing and labeling of drugs and devices, except labeling by a man-
ufacturer, packer or distributor of nonprescription drugs and commercially packaged  legend drugs
and devices;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1506 (SB 1506-A) Page 3
(c) The prescribing and administering of vaccines and immunizations  and the providing of pa-
tient care services pursuant to ORS 689.645;
(d) The administering of drugs and devices to the extent permitted under ORS 689.655;
(e) The participation in drug selection and drug utilization reviews;
(f) The  proper and safe storage of drugs and devices and the maintenance of proper records re-
garding the safe storage of drugs and devices;
(g) The responsibility for advising, where  necessary or where regulated, of therapeutic values,
content, hazards and use of drugs and devices;
(h) The monitoring of therapeutic response or adverse effect to drug therapy;
(i) The optimizing of drug therapy through the practice of clinical pharmacy;
(j) Patient care services,  including medication therapy management and comprehensive
medication review;
(k) The offering or performing of those acts, services, operations or transactions  necessary in
the conduct, operation, management and control of pharmacy;
(L) The prescribing and administering of injectable hormonal contraceptives and the prescribing
and dispensing of self-administered hormonal contraceptives pursuant to ORS 689.689;
(m) The prescribing and dispensing of emergency refills of  insulin and associated insulin-related
devices and supplies pursuant to ORS 689.696;
(n) The  prescribing, dispensing and administering of preexposure prophylactic antiretroviral
therapies and post-exposure prophylactic antiretroviral therapies,  pursuant to ORS 689.704 and rules
adopted by the board under ORS 689.645 and 689.704; [ and]
(o) The delegation  of tasks to other health care providers who are appropriately trained and
authorized to perform the delegated tasks[ .]; and
(p) The testing for severe  acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 (SARS-CoV-2) and
the prescribing, dispensing and administering of treatment for SARS-CoV-2  pursuant to
section 4 of  this 2024 Act and rules adopted by the board pursuant to section 4 of this 2024
Act.
(30) “Practitioner”  means a person licensed and operating within the scope of such license to
prescribe, dispense, conduct research with  respect to or administer drugs in the course of profes-
sional practice or research:
(a) In this state; or
(b) In another state or territory of the United States if the person does not  reside in Oregon
and is registered under the federal Controlled Substances Act.
(31) “Preceptor” means a pharmacist or a person licensed by the board to  supervise the
internship training of a licensed intern.
(32) “Prescription drug” or “legend drug” means a drug that is:
(a) Required by federal law, prior to being dispensed or delivered, to be labeled  with either of
the following statements:
(A) “Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription”; or
(B) “Caution: Federal law restricts this drug  to use by or on the order of a licensed
veterinarian”; or
(b) Required by any applicable federal or state law or regulation  to be dispensed on prescription
only or is restricted to use by practitioners only.
(33) “Prescription” or “prescription drug order” means a written, oral  or electronically trans-
mitted direction, given by a practitioner  authorized to prescribe drugs, for the preparation and use
of a drug. When the context requires, “prescription” also means the drug prepared  under such
written, oral or electronically transmitted direction.
(34) “Retail drug outlet” means a place used for the conduct  of the retail sale, administering or
dispensing or compounding of drugs or chemicals or for the  administering or dispensing of pre-
scriptions and licensed by the board as  a place where the practice of pharmacy may lawfully occur.
(35) “Self-administered hormonal contraceptive” means  a drug composed of a hormone or a
combination  of  hormones that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration to
Enrolled Senate Bill 1506 (SB 1506-A) Page 4
prevent pregnancy and that the patient to whom the drug is prescribed may administer to oneself.
“Self-administered hormonal contraceptive” includes, but is not limited to, hormonal  contraceptive
patches and hormonal contraceptive pills.
(36) “Third-party logistics provider” means an entity that:
(a) Provides or  coordinates warehousing of, or other logistics services for, a product in inter-
state commerce on behalf of a manufacturer, wholesale distributor or dispenser of the product; and
(b) Does not  take ownership of, or have responsibility to direct the sale or disposition of, the
product.
(37) “Unit dose” means a sealed single-unit container so designed that the contents  are admin-
istered to the  patient as a single dose, direct from the container. Each unit dose container must bear
a separate label, be labeled with the name and  strength of the medication, the name of the man-
ufacturer or distributor, an identifying lot number and, if applicable, the expiration  date of the
medication.
(38) “Wholesale distributor drug outlet” means a person, other than a manufacturer,
manufacturer’s colicensed partner, third-party logistics  provider or repackager, as defined in 21
U.S.C. 360eee(16), that is engaged in wholesale distribution, as defined in 21 U.S.C. 353(e)(4).
SECTION 6.
 ORS 689.005, as amended by section 5 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
689.005. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Administer” means the direct application of a drug or device  whether by injection,
inhalation, ingestion, or any other means, to the body of a patient or research subject by:
(a) A practitioner or the practitioner’s authorized agent; or
(b) The patient or research subject at the direction of the practitioner.
(2) “Approved continuing pharmacy education program” means those seminars, classes,
meetings, workshops  and other educational programs on the subject of pharmacy approved by the
State Board of Pharmacy.
(3) “Clinical pharmacy agreement” means an agreement  between a pharmacist or pharmacy and
a health  care organization or a physician as defined in ORS 677.010 or a naturopathic physician as
defined in  ORS 685.010 that permits the pharmacist to engage in the practice of clinical pharmacy
for the benefit of the patients of the health care organization, physician or naturopathic physician.
(4) “Continuing pharmacy education” means:
(a) Professional, pharmaceutical post-graduate  education in the general areas of socio-economic
and legal aspects of health care;
(b) The properties and actions of drugs and dosage forms; and
(c) The etiology, characteristics and therapeutics of the disease state.
(5) “Continuing pharmacy education unit”  means the unit of measurement of credits for ap-
proved continuing education courses and programs.
(6) “Deliver” or “delivery” means the actual, constructive or attempted  transfer of a drug or
device other than by administration from one person to another, whether or not for a consideration.
(7) “Device” means an instrument, apparatus, implement, machine, contrivance, implant, in vitro
reagent or other similar or related article, including any component part or accessory, which is re-
quired under federal or state law to be prescribed by a practitioner and  dispensed by a pharmacist.
(8) “Dispense” or “dispensing”  means the preparation and delivery of a prescription drug pur-
suant to a lawful order of a practitioner in a  suitable container appropriately labeled for subsequent
administration to or use by a patient or other individual entitled to receive the prescription drug.
(9) “Distribute” means the delivery of a drug other than by administering or dispensing.
(10) “Drug” means:
(a) Articles recognized as drugs  in the official United States Pharmacopoeia, official National
Formulary, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia,  other drug compendium or any supplement to any
of them;
(b) Articles intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,  treatment or prevention of dis-
ease in a human or other animal;
Enrolled Senate Bill 1506 (SB 1506-A) Page 5
(c) Articles, other than food, intended to affect the  structure or any function of the body of
humans or other animals; and
(d) Articles intended for use as a  component of any articles specified in paragraph (a), (b) or (c)
of this subsection.
(11) “Drug order” means a written order, in a hospital or other inpatient care facility,  for an
ultimate user of any drug or device issued and signed by a practitioner, or an order  transmitted by
other means of communication from a practitioner, that  is immediately reduced to writing by a
pharmacist, licensed nurse or other practitioner.
(12) “Drug outlet” means a pharmacy, nursing home, shelter home, convalescent home, extended
care facility, drug abuse  treatment center, penal institution, hospital, family planning clinic, student
health center, retail store, wholesaler, manufacturer, mail-order vendor or other establishment with
facilities located within or out of this state that is engaged in dispensing,  delivery or distribution
of drugs within this state.
(13) “Drug room” means a secure and lockable  location within an inpatient care facility that
does not have a licensed pharmacy.
(14) “Electronically transmitted” or “electronic transmission”  means a communication sent or
received through technological apparatuses, including computer  terminals or other equipment or
mechanisms linked by telephone or microwave relays, or similar apparatus having electrical,  digital,
magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic or similar capabilities.
(15) “Injectable hormonal contraceptive” means a drug composed of  a hormone or a combination
of hormones that is approved by the United States Food and Drug  Administration to prevent preg-
nancy and that a health care practitioner administers to the patient by injection.
(16) “Institutional drug outlet” means hospitals and inpatient care facilities where  medications
are dispensed to another health care professional for administration to patients served by the hos-
pitals or facilities.
(17) “Intern” means a person who is enrolled in or has completed a course of study at  a school
or college of pharmacy approved by the board and who is licensed with the board as an intern.
(18) “Internship” means a professional  experiential program approved by the board under the
supervision of a licensed pharmacist registered with the board as a preceptor.
(19) “Labeling” means the process of preparing and affixing of a label to any  drug container
exclusive, however, of the labeling by a manufacturer, packer or distributor of a  nonprescription
drug or commercially packaged legend drug or device.
(20) “Manufacture” means the production, preparation, propagation, compounding, conversion
or processing of a device  or a drug, either directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of
natural origin or independently by means of chemical synthesis or by a  combination of extraction
and chemical synthesis and includes any packaging or repackaging of the substances or labeling or
relabeling of its container, except that this term does not include the  preparation or compounding
of a  drug by an individual for their own use or the preparation, compounding, packaging or labeling
of a drug:
(a) By a practitioner as an incident to administering or dispensing of a drug in the course of
professional practice; or
(b) By a practitioner  or by the practitioner’s authorization under supervision of the practitioner
for the purpose of or as an incident to research, teaching or chemical analysis and not for sale.
(21) “Manufacturer” means a person engaged in the manufacture of drugs.
(22) “Nonprescription drug outlet” means a business or other  establishment that is open to the
general public for the sale or nonprofit distribution of nonprescription drugs and is  registered under
ORS 689.305.
(23) “Nonprescription drugs” means drugs that may be sold without a prescription and  that are
prepackaged for use by the consumer and labeled in accordance with the requirements  of the stat-
utes and regulations of this state and the federal government.
(24) “Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership, association or other legal entity.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1506 (SB 1506-A) Page 6
(25) “Pharmacist” means an individual licensed by  this state to engage in the practice of phar-
macy or to engage in the practice of clinical pharmacy.
(26) “Pharmacy” means  a place that meets the requirements of rules of the board, is licensed
and approved by the board where the practice of  pharmacy may lawfully occur and includes
apothecaries, drug stores, dispensaries, hospital outpatient pharmacies, pharmacy departments  and
prescription laboratories but does not include a place used by a manufacturer or wholesaler.
(27) “Pharmacy technician” means a person licensed by the board who assists in  the practice
of pharmacy pursuant to rules of the board.
(28) “Practice of clinical pharmacy” means:
(a) The health science discipline in which, in conjunction with the  patient’s other practitioners,
a pharmacist provides patient care  to optimize medication therapy and to promote disease pre-
vention and the patient’s health and wellness;
(b) The provision of patient care services, including but not  limited to post-diagnostic disease
state management services; and
(c) The practice of pharmacy by a pharmacist pursuant to a clinical pharmacy agreement.
(29) “Practice of pharmacy” means:
(a) The interpretation and evaluation of prescription orders;
(b) The compounding, dispensing and labeling of drugs and devices, except labeling by a man-
ufacturer, packer or  distributor of nonprescription drugs and commercially packaged legend drugs
and devices;
(c) The prescribing and administering of  vaccines and immunizations and the providing of pa-
tient care services pursuant to ORS 689.645;
(d) The administering of drugs and devices to the extent permitted under ORS 689.655;
(e) The participation in drug selection and drug utilization reviews;
(f) The proper and safe storage of drugs and devices and the maintenance of proper records  re-
garding the safe storage of drugs and devices;
(g) The responsibility for advising, where necessary or  where regulated, of therapeutic values,
content, hazards and use of drugs and devices;
(h) The monitoring of therapeutic response or adverse effect to drug therapy;
(i) The optimizing of drug therapy through the practice of clinical pharmacy;
(j) Patient care services, including medication therapy  management and comprehensive
medication review;
(k) The offering  or performing of those acts, services, operations or transactions necessary in
the conduct, operation, management and control of pharmacy;
(L) The prescribing and administering of injectable hormonal contraceptives and the prescribing
and dispensing of self-administered hormonal contraceptives pursuant to ORS 689.689;
(m) The prescribing and dispensing of emergency refills of  insulin and associated insulin-related
devices and supplies pursuant to ORS 689.696;
(n) The prescribing, dispensing and administering of preexposure prophylactic  antiretroviral
therapies and post-exposure prophylactic antiretroviral therapies,  pursuant to ORS 689.704 and rules
adopted by the board under ORS 689.645 and 689.704; and
(o) The delegation of tasks to other health care providers who are appropriately  trained and
authorized to perform the delegated tasks[ ; and ]
[(p) The testing for severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus  2 (SARS-CoV-2) and the pre-
scribing, dispensing and administering  of treatment for SARS-CoV-2 pursuant to section 4 of this 2024
Act and rules adopted by the board pursuant to section 4 of this 2024 Act ].
(30) “Practitioner” means a person licensed and operating within the scope of such license  to
prescribe, dispense, conduct research with respect to or administer drugs in  the course of profes-
sional practice or research:
(a) In this state; or
(b) In another state  or territory of the United States if the person does not reside in Oregon
and is registered under the federal Controlled Substances Act.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1506 (SB 1506-A) Page 7
(31) “Preceptor” means  a pharmacist or a person licensed by the board to supervise the
internship training of a licensed intern.
(32) “Prescription drug” or “legend drug” means a drug that is:
(a) Required by federal  law, prior to being dispensed or delivered, to be labeled with either of
the following statements:
(A) “Caution: Federal law prohibits dispensing without prescription”; or
(B) “Caution: Federal law restricts this drug to use by or on the order of a licensed
veterinarian”; or
(b) Required by any applicable federal or state law or regulation  to be dispensed on prescription
only or is restricted to use by practitioners only.
(33) “Prescription” or “prescription  drug order” means a written, oral or electronically trans-
mitted direction, given by a practitioner authorized to prescribe drugs,  for the preparation and use
of a drug.  When the context requires, “prescription” also means the drug prepared under such
written, oral or electronically transmitted direction.
(34) “Retail drug outlet” means a place used for the conduct  of the retail sale, administering or
dispensing or compounding of drugs or  chemicals or for the administering or dispensing of pre-
scriptions and licensed by the board as  a place where the practice of pharmacy may lawfully occur.
(35) “Self-administered hormonal contraceptive” means a drug composed of  a hormone or a
combination of hormones that is approved by the United States Food and Drug Administration  to
prevent pregnancy and that the patient to whom the drug is prescribed may administer to oneself.
“Self-administered  hormonal  contraceptive” includes, but is not limited to, hormonal contraceptive
patches and hormonal contraceptive pills.
(36) “Third-party logistics provider” means an entity that:
(a) Provides or  coordinates warehousing of, or other logistics services for, a product in inter-
state commerce on behalf of a manufacturer, wholesale distributor or dispenser of the product; and
(b) Does not  take ownership of, or have responsibility to direct the sale or disposition of, the
product.
(37) “Unit dose” means a sealed single-unit container so designed that the contents  are admin-
istered to the  patient as a single dose, direct from the container. Each unit dose container must bear
a separate label, be labeled with the name and  strength of the medication, the name of the man-
ufacturer or distributor, an identifying lot number and, if applicable, the expiration  date of the
medication.
(38) “Wholesale distributor drug outlet” means a person, other than a manufacturer,
manufacturer’s colicensed partner, third-party logistics  provider or repackager, as defined in 21
U.S.C. 360eee(16), that is engaged in wholesale distribution, as defined in 21 U.S.C. 353(e)(4).
SECTION 7.
 ORS 743A.051 is amended to read:
743A.051. (1) Notwithstanding any provisions of a health  benefit plan as defined in ORS
743B.005, whenever the plan provides for  payment or reimbursement for a service that is within the
lawful scope of practice of a pharmacist, the insurer:
[(1)] (a) May provide payment or reimbursement for  the service when the service is provided
by a pharmacist; and
[(2)] (b) Shall provide, in the same manner as would be provided for any other health  care pro-
vider, payment or reimbursement for:
[(a)(A)] (A)(i) The prescription of emergency refills  of insulin and associated insulin-related de-
vices and supplies as described in ORS 689.696; and
[(B)] (ii) The service provided by the pharmacist;
[(b)(A) ] (B)(i) The prescription, dispensation and administration of preexposure and  post-
exposure prophylactic antiretroviral therapies pursuant to ORS 689.704 and any rules adopted by the
State Board of Pharmacy under ORS 689.645 and 689.704; and
[(B)] (ii) The service provided by the pharmacist; [ and]
Enrolled Senate Bill 1506 (SB 1506-A) Page 8
(C)(i) The testing for severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 (SARS-CoV-2)  and
the prescribing, dispensing  and administering of treatment for SARS-CoV-2 pursuant to
section 4 of this 2024 Act; and
(ii) The service provided by the pharmacist; and
[(c)(A) ] (D)(i) The prescription and dispensation of other prescription  drugs by a licensed
pharmacist if the State Board of Pharmacy or any state law authorizes the drug to be prescribed
and dispensed by pharmacists licensed under ORS chapter 689; and
[(B)] (ii) The service provided by the pharmacist.
[(3)] (2) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 8.
 ORS 743A.051, as amended by section 7 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
743A.051. (1) Notwithstanding any provisions of a health benefit plan as  defined in ORS
743B.005, whenever the plan provides for  payment or reimbursement for a service that is within the
lawful scope of practice of a pharmacist, the insurer:
(a) May provide payment or reimbursement for the service when the service is provided  by a
pharmacist; and
(b) Shall provide,  in the same manner as would be provided for any other health care provider,
payment or reimbursement for:
(A)(i) The prescription of emergency refills of insulin and associated insulin-related devices and
supplies as described in ORS 689.696; and
(ii) The service provided by the pharmacist;
(B)(i) The prescription,  dispensation and administration of preexposure and post-exposure
prophylactic antiretroviral therapies  pursuant to ORS 689.704 and any rules adopted by the State
Board of Pharmacy under ORS 689.645 and 689.704; and
(ii) The service provided by the pharmacist; and
[(C)(i) The testing for severe acute respiratory syndrome coronavirus 2 (SARS-CoV-2)  and the
prescribing, dispensing and administering of treatment for SARS-CoV-2 pursuant  to section 4 of this
2024 Act; and ]
[(ii) The service provided by the pharmacist; and ]
[(D)(i)] (C)(i) The prescription and dispensation of other prescription drugs  by a licensed
pharmacist if the State Board of Pharmacy or any state law authorizes the drug to be prescribed
and dispensed by pharmacists licensed under ORS chapter 689; and
(ii) The service provided by the pharmacist.
(2) This section is exempt from ORS 743A.001.
SECTION 9.
 ORS 243.144 is amended to read:
243.144. Benefit plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply  with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; [ and]
(10) ORS 743A.325 ; and
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c) .
SECTION 10.
 ORS 243.144, as amended by section 9 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
243.144. Benefit plans offered by the Public Employees’ Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services and supplies must comply  with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
Enrolled Senate Bill 1506 (SB 1506-A) Page 9
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; and
(10) ORS 743A.325[ ; and ]
[(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c) ].
SECTION 11.
 ORS 243.877 is amended to read:
243.877. Benefit plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services  and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; [ and]
(10) ORS 743A.325[ .]; and
(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c).
SECTION 12.
 ORS 243.877, as amended by section 11 of this 2024 Act, is amended to read:
243.877. Benefit plans offered by the Oregon Educators Benefit Board that reimburse the cost
of medical and other health services  and supplies must comply with the requirements for health
benefit plan coverage described in:
(1) ORS 743A.058;
(2) ORS 743A.140;
(3) ORS 743A.141;
(4) ORS 743B.256;
(5) ORS 743B.287 (4);
(6) ORS 743B.420;
(7) ORS 743B.423;
(8) ORS 743B.601;
(9) ORS 743B.810; and
(10) ORS 743A.325[ ; and ]
[(11) ORS 743A.051 (2)(c) ].
SECTION 13.
The amendments to ORS 243.144, 243.877, 689.005  and 743A.051 by sections
6, 8, 10 and 12 of this 2024 Act become operative on June 30, 2026.
SECTION 14. (1) The amendments to ORS 243.144 by section  9 of this 2024 Act apply to
benefit plans issued, renewed or extended on or after October 1, 2024.
(2) The amendments to ORS 243.877 by section 11 of this 2024  Act apply to benefit plans
issued, renewed or extended on or after October 1, 2024.
(3) The amendments to ORS 743A.051 by section 7 of this 2024 Act apply to health benefit
plans issued, renewed or extended on or after October 1, 2024.
SECTION 15. Sections 2 and 4 of this 2024 Act are repealed on June 30, 2026.
Enrolled Senate Bill 1506 (SB 1506-A) Page 10
SECTION 16. (1) Sections 2 and 4 of this 2024  Act and the amendments to ORS 243.144,
243.877, 689.005 and 743A.051 by sections 5, 7, 9 and 11 of this 2024 Act become operative on
October 1, 2024.
(2) The Oregon Health  Authority, the Oregon Educators Benefit Board, the Public
Employees’ Benefit Board and the State Board of Pharmacy may take any action before  the
operative date specified in this section that  is necessary to enable the authority and the
boards to  exercise, on or after the operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section,
all of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the authority and the boards by  sections
2 and 4 of this 2024 Act and the  amendments to ORS 243.144, 243.877, 689.005 and 743A.051
by sections 5, 7, 9 and 11 of this 2024 Act.
SECTION 17. This 2024 Act takes effect on the 91st day after the date on  which the 2024
regular session of the Eighty-second Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by Senate February 20, 2024
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House February 28, 2024
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2024
..................................................................................
LaVonne Griffin-Valade, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 1506 (SB 1506-A) Page 11